District of Columbia statutes.
25-212

New licensee and general public orientation class.

ABRA shall establish a new licensee orientation class that shall be available to licensees and the public at no charge. The class curriculum shall include the following:

(1)

A review of relevant provisions contained in both this title and Title 23 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations;

(2)

Noise abatement and sound management; and

(3)

How to work proactively with Advisory Neighborhood Commissions, neighborhood and business groups, and residents.

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-310, § 2(h), 60 DCR 3410
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 2(h) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-52, April 22, 2013, 60 DCR 6372, 20 DCSTAT 1388).